Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Space
Renaissance Act".
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Space
Industry Development Authority from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of One Million Three
HB2024 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Hund red Thousand Dollars ($1,300,000.00) or so much thereof as may
be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the Oklahoma Space
Industry Development Authority by law.
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Space
Industry Development Authority from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Thirty-five Million
Dollars ($35,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
accomplish infrastructure investments at the Oklahoma Air and Space
Port to support testing and launching of spacecraft and for science,
technology, engineering, and math (STEM) engagement activities.
SECTION 4. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Space
Industry Development Authority from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Fifteen Million
Dollars ($15,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
accomplish infrastructure and programmatic investments in a
microgravity research consortium focused on applied science for
commercialization activities at the Oklahoma City Innovation
District in partnership with Oklahoma-based independent research
institutes.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
HB2024 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
02/26/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.




















HB2024 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.